src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.aff
SFX X й ядиганга-да [й]
SFX X й ядигангадир-да [й]
SFX X й ядигангамикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганга-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганданми [й]
SFX X й ядигандандир [й]
SFX X й ядигандан-да [й]
SFX X й ядигандандир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганданмикан [й]
SFX X й ядигандан-ку [й]
SFX X й ядигандами [й]
SFX X й ядигандадир [й]
SFX X й ядиганда-да [й]
SFX X й ядигандадир-да [й]
SFX X й ядигандамикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганда-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганларними [й]
SFX X й ядиганларнидир [й]
SFX X й ядиганларни-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганларнидир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганларнимикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганларни-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганларгами [й]
SFX X й ядиганларгадир [й]
SFX X й ядиганларга-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганларгадир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганларгамикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганларга-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганларданми [й]
SFX X й ядиганлардандир [й]
SFX X й ядиганлардан-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганлардандир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганларданмикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганлардан-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганлардами [й]
SFX X й ядиганлардадир [й]
SFX X й ядиганларда-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганлардадир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганлардамикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганларда-ку [й]
SFX X й янингми [й]
SFX X й янингдир [й]
SFX X й янинг-да [й]
SFX X й янингдир-да [й]
SFX X й янингмикан [й]
SFX X й янинг-ку [й]
SFX X й яимни [й]
SFX X й яимними [й]
SFX X й яимнидир [й]
SFX X й яимни-да [й]
SFX X й яимнидир-да [й]
SFX X й яимнимикан [й]
SFX X й яимни-ку [й]
SFX X й яимнинг [й]
SFX X й яимнингми [й]
SFX X й яимнингдир [й]
SFX X й яимнинг-да [й]
SFX X й яимнингдир-да [й]
SFX X й яимнингмикан [й]
SFX X й яимнинг-ку [й]
SFX X й яимга [й]
SFX X й яимгами [й]
SFX X й яимгадир [й]
SFX X й яимга-да [й]
SFX X й яимгадир-да [й]
SFX X й яимгамикан [й]
SFX X й яимга-ку [й]
SFX X й яимдан [й]
SFX X й яимданми [й]
SFX X й яимдандир [й]
SFX X й яимдан-да [й]
SFX X й яимдандир-да [й]
SFX X й яимданмикан [й]
SFX X й яимдан-ку [й]
SFX X й яимда [й]
SFX X й яимдами [й]
SFX X й яимдадир [й]
SFX X й яимда-да [й]
SFX X й яимдадир-да [й]
SFX X й яимдамикан [й]
SFX X й яимда-ку [й]
SFX X й яини [й]
SFX X й яиними [й]
SFX X й яинидир [й]
SFX X й яини-да [й]
SFX X й яинидир-да [й]
SFX X й яинимикан [й]
SFX X й яини-ку [й]
SFX X й яининг [й]
SFX X й яинингми [й]
SFX X й яинингдир [й]
SFX X й яининг-да [й]
SFX X й яинингдир-да [й]
SFX X й яинингмикан [й]
SFX X й яининг-ку [й]
SFX X й яига [й]
SFX X й яигами [й]
SFX X й яигадир [й]
SFX X й яига-да [й]
SFX X й яигадир-да [й]
SFX X й яигамикан [й]
SFX X й яига-ку [й]
SFX X й яидан [й]
SFX X й яиданми [й]
SFX X й яидандир [й]
SFX X й яидан-да [й]
SFX X й яидандир-да [й]
SFX X й яиданмикан [й]
SFX X й яидан-ку [й]
SFX X й яида [й]
SFX X й яидами [й]
SFX X й яидадир [й]
SFX X й яида-да [й]
SFX X й яидадир-да [й]
SFX X й яидамикан [й]
SFX X й яида-ку [й]
SFX X й яимизни [й]
SFX X й яимизними [й]
SFX X й яимизнидир [й]
SFX X й яимизни-да [й]
SFX X й яимизнидир-да [й]
SFX X й яимизнимикан [й]
SFX X й яимизни-ку [й]
SFX X й яимизнинг [й]
SFX X й яимизнингми [й]
SFX X й яимизнингдир [й]
SFX X й яимизнинг-да [й]
SFX X й яимизнингдир-да [й]
SFX X й яимизнингмикан [й]
SFX X й яимизнинг-ку [й]
SFX X й яимизга [й]
SFX X й яимизгами [й]
SFX X й яимизгадир [й]
SFX X й яимизга-да [й]
SFX X й яимизгадир-да [й]
SFX X й яимизгамикан [й]
SFX X й яимизга-ку [й]
SFX X й яимиздан [й]
SFX X й яимизданми [й]
SFX X й яимиздандир [й]
SFX X й яимиздан-да [й]
SFX X й яимиздандир-да [й]
SFX X й яимизданмикан [й]
SFX X й яимиздан-ку [й]
SFX X й яимизда [й]
SFX X й яимиздами [й]
SFX X й яимиздадир [й]
SFX X й яимизда-да [й]
SFX X й яимиздадир-да [й]
SFX X й яимиздамикан [й]
SFX X й яимизда-ку [й]
SFX X й яингизни [й]
SFX X й яингизними [й]
SFX X й яингизнидир [й]
SFX X й яингизни-да [й]
SFX X й яингизнидир-да [й]
SFX X й яингизнимикан [й]
SFX X й яингизни-ку [й]
SFX X й яингизнинг [й]
SFX X й яингизнингми [й]
SFX X й яингизнингдир [й]
SFX X й яингизнинг-да [й]
SFX X й яингизнингдир-да [й]
SFX X й яингизнингмикан [й]
SFX X й яингизнинг-ку [й]
SFX X й яингизга [й]
SFX X й яингизгами [й]
SFX X й яингизгадир [й]
SFX X й яингизга-да [й]
SFX X й яингизгадир-да [й]
SFX X й яингизгамикан [й]
SFX X й яингизга-ку [й]
SFX X й яингиздан [й]
SFX X й яингизданми [й]
SFX X й яингиздандир [й]
SFX X й яингиздан-да [й]
SFX X й яингиздандир-да [й]
SFX X й яингизданмикан [й]
SFX X й яингиздан-ку [й]
SFX X й яингизда [й]
SFX X й яингиздами [й]
SFX X й яингиздадир [й]
SFX X й яингизда-да [й]
SFX X й яингиздадир-да [й]
SFX X й яингиздамикан [й]
SFX X й яингизда-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганнингми [й]
SFX X й ядиганнингдир [й]
SFX X й ядиганнинг-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганнингдир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганнингмикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганнинг-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганимни [й]
SFX X й ядиганимними [й]
SFX X й ядиганимнидир [й]
SFX X й ядиганимни-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимнидир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимнимикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимни-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганимнинг [й]
SFX X й ядиганимнингми [й]
SFX X й ядиганимнингдир [й]
SFX X й ядиганимнинг-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимнингдир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимнингмикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимнинг-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганимга [й]
SFX X й ядиганимгами [й]
SFX X й ядиганимгадир [й]
SFX X й ядиганимга-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимгадир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимгамикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимга-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганимдан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимданми [й]
SFX X й ядиганимдандир [й]
SFX X й ядиганимдан-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимдандир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимданмикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимдан-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганимда [й]
SFX X й ядиганимдами [й]
SFX X й ядиганимдадир [й]
SFX X й ядиганимда-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимдадир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимдамикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимда-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганини [й]
SFX X й ядиганиними [й]
SFX X й ядиганинидир [й]
SFX X й ядиганини-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганинидир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганинимикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганини-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганининг [й]
SFX X й ядиганинингми [й]
SFX X й ядиганинингдир [й]
SFX X й ядиганининг-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганинингдир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганинингмикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганининг-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганига [й]
SFX X й ядиганигами [й]
SFX X й ядиганигадир [й]
SFX X й ядиганига-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганигадир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганигамикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганига-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганидан [й]
SFX X й ядиганиданми [й]
SFX X й ядиганидандир [й]
SFX X й ядиганидан-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганидандир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганиданмикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганидан-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганида [й]
SFX X й ядиганидами [й]
SFX X й ядиганидадир [й]
SFX X й ядиганида-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганидадир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганидамикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганида-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизни [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизними [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизнидир [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизни-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизнидир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизнимикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизни-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизнинг [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизнингми [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизнингдир [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизнинг-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизнингдир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизнингмикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизнинг-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизга [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизгами [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизгадир [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизга-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизгадир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизгамикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизга-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганимиздан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизданми [й]
SFX X й ядиганимиздандир [й]
SFX X й ядиганимиздан-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимиздандир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизданмикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимиздан-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизда [й]
SFX X й ядиганимиздами [й]
SFX X й ядиганимиздадир [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизда-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимиздадир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганимиздамикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганимизда-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизни [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизними [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизнидир [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизни-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизнидир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизнимикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизни-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизнинг [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизнингми [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизнингдир [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизнинг-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизнингдир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизнингмикан [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизнинг-ку [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизга [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизгами [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизгадир [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизга-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизгадир-да [й]
SFX X й ядиганингизгамикан [й]
