src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
аварчала/X
ағана/X
адреслан/X
ажримла/X
айбсит/X
айлантиргиз/X
айт/X
аксириш/X
алангалан/X
алжи/X
алмашинил/X
ангилла/X
аниқла/X
арабчалаш/X
арзонлаштир/X
артин/X
асқат/X
астойдиллан/X
афсуслан/X
ачиш/X
бағишла/X
бадҳоллан/X
бақрай/X
бараварла/X
бартарафла/X
баҳбаҳла/X
бегоналаш/X
безат/X
бекил/X
белгилат/X
берил/X
бетартиблаш/X
беҳаёлан/X
бидирла/X
биқси/X
билиқси/X
бирикиш/X
биткарил/X
боблаштир/X
боқ/X
болталаш/X
боронала/X
ботирлаш/X
бошлатил/X
бўғил/X
бўёқла/X
бўзлаш/X
букилтир/X
букчайтир/X
булғат/X
бура/X
буриқтир/X
бурмала/X
бута/X
бутунлан/X
буюклаш/X
вағвағла/X
вазминлаш/X
вангилла/X
вартиллат/X
вижвижла/X
вишилла/X
вориллат/X
газлаш/X
ганграт/X
гарангси/X
гибридлаштир/X
гипнозла/X
гувлаш/X
гулдура/X
гупилла/X
гуруллат/X
ғажирлаш/X
ғариблан/X
ғижирла/X
ғимирла/X
ғиринглаш/X
ғуборлат/X
ғужурла/X
ғусғусла/X
дазмоллат/X
дамбалат/X
даранғлат/X
дасталаш/X
дезинфекциялан/X
депсин/X
дикилла/X
димлантир/X
дифференциалла/X
документлаштир/X
дуддудла/X
дўқиллат/X
дўнғиллат/X
дўрай/X
ёвғонсира/X
ёғил/X
ёдлан/X
ёзол/X
ёқиш/X
елдир/X
ёллаш/X
ёмонла/X
енгиш/X
ёпиш/X
ёрқинлан/X
етилтир/X
ётқизил/X
ечинтирил/X
жабрлантир/X
жазилла/X
жангиллат/X
жаҳллантир/X
жикилла/X
жиллаштир/X
жимирла/X
жири/X
жойлаш/X
жуганлан/X
жунжик/X
задалан/X
занглат/X
зарядла/X
зидлан/X
зиралаш/X
золимлаш/X
зувулла/X
ивирсила/X
изғир/X
изоҳлаш/X
иқрорлан/X
илдамлаш/X
илиқтир/X
имилла/X
ингичкалаштир/X
индивидуаллаштирил/X
инлат/X
интиқ/X
ирғитиш/X
иси/X
ислантир/X
итариш/X
ихчамлан/X
ичиртирил/X
ишқир/X
ишонтир/X
йиғил/X
йиқитил/X
йироқлаштир/X
йўқлан/X
йўлиқтир/X
йўрт/X
кайфсизлантир/X
калтаклаш/X
капиталлаштирил/X
карчла/X
кафолатлан/X
кеккайиш/X
келтирт/X
керил/X
кескинлаштирил/X
кечикиш/X
кечтирил/X
кимёлаштир/X
кириштир/X
кичиклаш/X
клонлан/X
кодлаш/X
компостерла/X
контузиялан/X
крахмалла/X
кузат/X
куйин/X
куккулат/X
кўллат/X
кумушла/X
кўпайиш/X
кўпчит/X
кўрин/X
курсиллат/X
куттирил/X
кучсизлантирил/X
қави/X
қадоқлаш/X
қазиш/X
қайнаш/X
қайтил/X
қалайлат/X
қаллоблаш/X
қамчилаш/X
қаппайтир/X
қарит/X
қасмоқлан/X
қаторла/X
қашла/X
қизаринқира/X
қизитил/X
қийқириш/X
қийчувла/X
қилол/X
қимсин/X
қирқил/X
қисин/X
қитиқла/X
қичқир/X
қоғозлаштир/X
қоқиш/X
қон/X
қонталаш/X
қорай/X
қот/X
қувалаш/X
қувнаш/X
қўзила/X
қўққай/X
қулқуллат/X
қулунла/X
қўмса/X
қўпор/X
қўрил/X
қуроқла/X
қурумла/X
қутла/X
қўшилиш/X
лаззатлан/X
ларзанглат/X
лиқилла/X
логарифмла/X
лойлаш/X
лўқилла/X
маданийлаштир/X
мазахла/X
маймоқлаштир/X
маринадла/X
мафкуралаштирил/X
машқлантир/X
менгровси/X
мижиғла/X
минғайиш/X
мита/X
модуллаштир/X
муаллифлаштир/X
муккала/X
мункай/X
муҳрлан/X
намиқтир/X
негизла/X
нишла/X
номлан/X
нурлан/X
обрўсизлантир/X
оғрин/X
озонлаштир/X
олайиш/X
олтовлаш/X
орзула/X
осонлаштир/X
очилиш/X
ошлаш/X
парваришла/X
пастлат/X
пешлатил/X
пирқиллат/X
пишиқ/X
покизалан/X
проектла/X
пухталаш/X
рақамлаштир/X
режалаштирил/X
рулонлан/X
сайра/X
сандираш/X
сарғайтир/X
севиб-севил/X
сеп/X
сиғдириш/X
сийпа/X
силжи/X
сингдир/X
сирил/X
совиттир/X
созла/X
сохталан/X
суғорил/X
сўзлаштир/X
сўқтир/X
сур/X
сурка/X
суҳбатлаш/X
табриклан/X
такмиллаштир/X
тақиллат/X
талтанғла/X
таништирил/X
тараниш/X
тарсай/X
тати/X
ташит/X
таъсирлантир/X
тезик/X
тенглаш/X
тердирил/X
тижоратлаштир/X
тиккай/X
тилдир/X
тинғилла/X
типирчилаш/X
тирқира/X
титкилат/X
тозалат/X
томдиртир/X
топширтир/X
тубанлаштир/X
тўғрат/X
тўзит/X
туксизлантир/X
тулаттир/X
тумсай/X
тўплан/X
туркумлаштир/X
тутақ/X
тўхташ/X
увилла/X
уза/X
ўзиш/X
ўйил/X
ўйноқлат/X
ўқлаш/X
улканлаш/X
умумлаштир/X
ундирил/X
ўрантир/X
уриштирил/X
ўс/X
ўткиз/X
ухлаш/X
учла/X
уюштир/X
фикрла/X
халтала/X
хашакла/X
хирқират/X
хонакилаштирил/X
хуржунлаш/X
ҳаволан/X
ҳақиқатла/X
ҳароратлан/X
ҳимояла/X
ҳори/X
ҳуркиттир/X
чағиллаш/X
чақ/X
чалдирт/X
чанглат/X
чархлан/X
чекинтир/X
чиған/X
чийчийлат/X
чимдиш/X
чирқилла/X
чокла/X
чуваттир/X
чўзилтир/X
чуқурлат/X
чўпиллат/X
шабадалаш/X
шалвира/X
шарафла/X
шиббала/X
шилиқла/X
шипилла/X
шишир/X
шошиқ/X
шумшай/X
эговлаттир/X
элаттир/X
эн/X
эрмакла/X
эъзозлаш/X
юкла/X
юмалоқла/X
юрит/X
яксонла/X
яллиғлаш/X
яниш/X
яроғсизлантир/X
яшиклат/X
